Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 7. Used Vehicle Sales in Emission Inspection Areas.

Sec. 45.45.400.
Prohibited transfer of used motor vehicles.

A person engaged in the business of selling used motor vehicles may not transfer or assign the owner’s title or interest in the used vehicle to a person who resides in an area subject to a state-approved emission inspection program established under AS

46.14.400

or

46.14.510

and who intends to use the vehicle in that area, unless the vehicle displays a valid emissions inspection decal, has a valid record of emissions inspection with the Department of Administration, or has a certificate of inspection, even though the certificate shows that the vehicle is not in compliance with program requirements as required under the air pollution control requirements applicable in that area.

This section does not apply to a motor vehicle that when manufactured did not have a pollution control system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1992; am § 15 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 97 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For violation of this section as an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

.